California statutes. Elections Code
If a person has a family fixed in one place, and the person does business in another place, the former is the person’s place of domicile. However, if the person having a family fixed in one place, has taken up an abode in another place with the intention of remaining, and the person’s family does not so reside with the person, the person is a domiciliary where the person has so taken up the abode. For purposes of this section, a person may take up an abode at the same place at which the person does business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 63, Sec. 1.   (AB 679)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2029.

The domicile of one spouse shall not be presumed to be that of the other, but shall be determined independently in accordance with this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2030.

A domiciliary of this state who marries a person employed temporarily in this state in the service of the United States government, may elect to retain his or her domicile for the purpose of qualifying as an elector only, except that his or her domicile in this state shall terminate if the domiciliary qualifies as an elector in any other state or any territory.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2031.

If a person has more than one residence and that person maintains a homeowner’s property tax exemption on the dwelling of one of the residences pursuant to Section 218 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the residence subject to the homeowner’s property tax exemption is that person’s domicile. However, this presumption shall not apply in the event any other residence is listed as the person’s current residence address on any driver’s license, identification card or vehicle registration issued to that person by, and on file with, the Department of Motor Vehicles.

If a person has more than one residence and that person claims a renter’s tax credit for one of the residences pursuant to Section 17053.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the residence subject to the renter’s tax credit is that person’s domicile. However, this presumption shall not apply in the event any other residence is listed as the person’s current residence address on any driver’s license, identification card, or vehicle registration issued to that person by, and on file with, the Department of Motor Vehicles.

This section shall not be applicable to state or federal elected officials.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2032.

Except as provided in this article, if a person has more than one residence and that person has not physically resided at any one of the residences within the immediate preceding year, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that those residences in which he or she has not so resided within the immediate preceding year are merely residences as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 349 and not his or her domicile.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2033.

Whenever the house number or the mailing address of a voter has been changed and the voter’s domicile is the same, the public agency authorizing the change shall notify the county elections official in writing of the change and the county elections official shall make the change on the voter’s affidavit of registration and a new affidavit shall not be required.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2034.

A person domiciled in a house or apartment lying in more than one precinct shall be registered as domiciled in the precinct designated by the county elections official on the basis of the street address or other precinct the county elections official considers appropriate unless the person requests, either by letter or in person at the office of the county elections official, that he or she wishes to be domiciled for registration purposes in another precinct in which his or her house or apartment lies. In order to fulfill the requirements of this section, the letter of request shall include the name, signature, and residence address of the requester.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2035.

A person duly registered as a voter in any precinct in California who removes therefrom within 14 days prior to an election shall, for the purpose of that election, be entitled to vote in the precinct from which the person so removed until the close of the polls on the date of that election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 899, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Visually Impaired Voters [2050. - 2053.]

2050.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Visually Impaired Voter Assistance Act of 1989.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2051.

As used in this article, “visually impaired” means a person having central visual acuity not to exceed 20-200 in the better eye, with corrected lenses, or visual acuity greater than 20-200, but with a limitation in the field of vision such that the widest diameter of the visual field subtends at an angle of not greater than 20 degrees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2052.

It is the intent of the Legislature to promote the fundamental right to vote of visually impaired individuals, and to make efforts to improve public awareness of the availability of state voter information guide audio recordings and improve their delivery to these voters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 2.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2053.

The Secretary of State shall establish a Voting Accessibility Advisory Committee. The Secretary of State shall consult with the committee and consider the committee’s recommendations related to improving the accessibility of elections for voters with disabilities. The Secretary of State may implement the committee’s recommendations as he or she deems appropriate.

(a) The committee shall consist of the Secretary of State, his or her designees, and additional members appointed by the Secretary of State. The appointees shall have demonstrated experience with accessibility requirements for voters with disabilities or be a county elections official.

(b) The committee shall serve in an advisory capacity to the Secretary of State and shall do all of the following:

(1) Establish guidelines for reaching as many voters with disabilities as practical.

(2) Make recommendations for improving the availability and accessibility of election materials, including, but not limited to, state voter information guides, county voter information guides, and vote-by-mail ballots, and their delivery in print or alternative formats to voters with disabilities.

(3) Increase the distribution of public service announcements identifying the availability of election materials for voters with disabilities at least 45 days before any federal, state, and local election.

(4) Make recommendations for improving the accessibility of election materials made available on Internet Web sites that are in compliance with the most current, ratified standards under Section 508 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794d), as amended, and the Web Content Accessibility Guidelines 2.0 adopted by the World Wide Web Consortium for accessibility.

(5) Promote the Secretary of State’s toll-free voter registration telephone line for citizens needing voter registration information, including information for individuals with disabilities, and the California State Library and regional library services for individuals who are unable to read conventional print due to a visual, intellectual, learning, physical, or any other disability.

(6) Make recommendations for providing voters with disabilities the same access and participation as is provided to other voters who are not disabled, including the ability to vote privately and independently.

(7) Establish subcommittees to further the scope and purposes of the committee as they relate to improving voter services and access for individuals with disabilities, including, but not limited to, visually impaired voters and deaf or hard of hearing voters.

(8) Promote the use of plain language and alternative formats for election materials.

(9) Make recommendations for materials to train poll workers on issues related to serving voters with
 disabilities and providing accessible voting locations.

(c) A member shall not receive compensation, but each member shall be reimbursed for his or her reasonable and necessary expenses in connection with service on the committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 3.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Registration [2100. - 2194.1.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [2100. - 2124.]

2100.

A person shall not be registered except as provided in this chapter or Chapter 4.5, except upon the production and filing of a certified copy of a judgment of the superior court directing registration to be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 729, Sec. 1.   (AB 1461)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2101.

(a) A person entitled to register to vote shall be a United States citizen, a resident of California, not imprisoned for the conviction of a felony, and at least 18 years of age at the time of the next election.

(b) A person entitled to preregister to vote in an election shall be a United States citizen, a resident of California, not imprisoned for the conviction of a felony, and at least 16 years of age.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Imprisoned” means currently serving a state or federal prison term.

(2) “Conviction” does not include a juvenile adjudication made pursuant to Section 203 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 320, Sec. 1.   (AB 646)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Note: The operational condition in Sec. 10 of Ch. 320 was satisfied by approval of Prop. 17 (ACA 6) at the Nov. 3, 2020, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2102.

(a) Except as provided in Chapter 4.5, a person shall not be registered as a voter except by affidavit of registration. The affidavit of registration shall be mailed or delivered to the county elections official and shall set forth all of the facts required to be shown by this chapter. A properly executed affidavit of registration shall be deemed effective upon receipt of the affidavit by the county elections official if
 received on or before the 15th day
 before an election to be held in the registrant’s precinct. A properly executed affidavit of registration shall also be deemed effective upon receipt of the affidavit by the county elections official if any of the following apply:

(1) The affidavit is postmarked on or before the 15th day before the election and received by mail by the county elections official.

(2) The affidavit is submitted to the Department of Motor Vehicles or accepted by any other public agency designated as a voter registration agency pursuant to the federal
 National Voter Registration Act of 1993
 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.) on or before the 15th day before the election.

(3) The affidavit is delivered to the county elections official by means other than those described in paragraphs (1) and (2) on or before the 15th day
 before the election.

(4) The affidavit is submitted electronically on the Internet Web site of the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 2196 on or before the 15th day before the election.

(b) For purposes of verifying a signature on a recall, initiative, or referendum petition or a signature on a nomination paper or any other election petition or election paper, a properly executed affidavit of registration shall be deemed effective for verification purposes if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The affidavit is signed on the same date or a date
 before the signing of the petition or paper.

(2) The affidavit is received by the county elections official on or before the date on which the petition or paper is filed.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the affidavit of registration required under this chapter shall not be taken under sworn oath, but the content of the affidavit shall be certified as to its truthfulness and correctness, under penalty of perjury, by the signature of the affiant.

(d) A person who is at least 16 years of age and otherwise meets all eligibility requirements to vote may submit his or her affidavit of registration as prescribed by this section. A properly executed affidavit of
 registration made pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed effective as of the date the affiant will be 18 years of age, if the information in the affidavit of registration is still current at that time. If the information provided by the affiant in the affidavit of registration is not current at the time that the affidavit of
 registration would otherwise become effective, for his or her registration to become effective, the affiant shall provide the current information to the proper county elections official as prescribed by this chapter.

(e) An individual with a disability who is otherwise qualified to vote may complete an affidavit of registration with reasonable accommodations as needed.

(f) An individual with a disability who is under a conservatorship may be registered to vote if he or she has not been disqualified from voting.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 364, and Stats. 2014, Ch. 909, Sec. 6.5) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 736, Sec. 3.5.   (SB 589)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Amendment by Stats. 2009, Ch. 364, with text revised by this amendment, became operative on September 26, 2016, when the Secretary of State issued the certification prescribed by Sec. 7 of Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

2103.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the election board of each county, in order to promote and encourage voter registrations, shall establish a sufficient number of registration places throughout the county, and outside the county courthouse, for the convenience of persons desiring to register, to the end that registration may be maintained at a high level.

(b) It is also the intent of the Legislature that county elections officials, in order to promote and encourage voter registrations, shall enlist the support and cooperation of interested citizens and organizations in such a way as to reach most effectively every resident of the county.

(c) It is also the intent of the Legislature that non-English-speaking citizens, like all other citizens, should be encouraged to vote. Therefore, appropriate efforts should be made to minimize obstacles to registration by citizens who lack sufficient skill in English to register without assistance.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that county elections officials be permitted to distribute affidavits of registration and voter registration cards, in all languages required by Section 203 
 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503) or Section 4(f)(4) (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10303(f)(4)) of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965, by using the county’s Internet Web site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 3.   (AB 1020)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Operative September 26, 2016, when the Secretary of State issued the certification prescribed by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

2105.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to maintain voter registration at the highest possible level.

(b) A county that does not satisfy the conditions to conduct an all-mailed ballot election pursuant to Section 4005 shall design and implement a voter education and outreach plan pursuant to this section. The purpose of the plan shall be to identify and register qualified electors who are not registered to vote and to encourage participation in the electoral process.

(c) Each voter education and outreach plan shall, at a minimum, provide information to the public about online voter registration, preregistration
 opportunities, vote by mail procedures, ballot tracking services, options for military and overseas voters, options for voters with disabilities, options for in-person voting opportunities, language accessibility, and key election dates and deadlines.

(d) (1) The Secretary of State shall provide county elections officials a template for their voter education and outreach plans.

(2) (A) The Secretary of State shall make the most current version of each voter education and outreach plan available on the Secretary of State’s internet website.

(B) The county elections official shall make the most current version of its voter education and outreach plan available on the county elections internet website.

(3) County elections officials shall submit any amendments to their voter education and outreach plans to the Secretary of State by October 1 of each odd-numbered year.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 301, Sec. 2.   (AB 1411)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2105.5.

(a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall do both of the following:

(1) Establish and maintain on the department’s Internet Web site a hyperlink to the Internet Web site at which information provided by the Secretary of State regarding voting rights for persons with a criminal history may be found.

(2) Post, in each parole office where parolees are seen, a notice that contains the Internet Web site address at which information provided by the Secretary of State regarding voting rights for persons with a criminal history may be found.

(b) Each county
 probation department shall do both of the following:

(1) Establish and maintain on the county probation department’s Internet Web site a hyperlink to the Internet Web site at which
 information provided by the Secretary of State regarding voting rights for persons with a criminal history may be found.

(2) Post, in each probation office where probationers are seen, a notice that contains the Internet Web site address at which information provided by the Secretary of State regarding voting rights for persons with a criminal history may be found.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 796, Sec. 1.   (AB 1344)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2105.6.

(a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide each person on parole under its jurisdiction, upon that person’s request made at any time during the parole, information provided by the Secretary of State regarding voting rights for persons with a criminal history.

(b) Each county probation department is encouraged to notify persons that a printed version of information regarding voting rights for persons with a criminal history who are under the department’s supervision is available
 upon request.

(c) Each county probation department shall provide each person under the department’s supervision, upon the person’s request, information provided by the Secretary of State regarding voting rights for persons with a criminal history.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 320, Sec. 2.   (AB 646)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Note: The operational condition in Sec. 10 of Ch. 320 was satisfied by approval of Prop. 17 (ACA 6) at the Nov. 3, 2020, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2105.7.

(a) A state or local juvenile detention facility, including, but not limited to, a juvenile hall, juvenile ranch, juvenile camp, or a facility of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice, shall do all of the following:

(1) Identify each individual housed in the facility who is of age to register to vote and not in prison for the conviction of a felony.

(2) Provide an affidavit of registration to each individual housed in the facility who is of age to register to vote and not in prison for the conviction of a felony by doing either of the following:

(A) Providing the individual a paper affidavit of registration.

(B) Directing the individual to an affidavit of registration provided on the internet website of the Secretary of State.

(3) Assist each individual housed in the facility who is of age to register to vote and not in prison for the conviction of a felony with the completion of the affidavit of registration, unless the individual declines assistance.

(b) A facility providing paper affidavits of registration pursuant to subdivision (a) shall do either of the following:

(1) Assist the individual who completed the voter registration card in returning the completed card to the county elections
 official.

(2) Accept any completed voter registration card and transmit the card to the county elections official.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 320, Sec. 3.   (AB 646)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Note: The operational condition in Sec. 10 of Ch. 320 was satisfied by approval of Prop. 17 (ACA 6) at the Nov. 3, 2020, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2106.

A program adopted by a county pursuant to Section 2103 or 2105, that is designed to encourage the registration of electors, shall contain the following statement in printed literature or media announcements made in connection with the program: “A person entitled to register to vote must be a United States citizen, a resident of California, not currently imprisoned in a state or federal prison for the conviction of a felony, and at least 18 years of age at the time of the election. A person may preregister to vote if that person is a United States citizen, a resident of California, not currently imprisoned in a state or federal prison for the conviction of a felony, and at least 16 years of age.” A county elections official may continue to use existing materials before
 printing new or revised materials required by any changes to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 320, Sec. 4.   (AB 646)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Note: The operational condition in Sec. 10 of Ch. 320 was satisfied by approval of Prop. 17 (ACA 6) at the Nov. 3, 2020, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2111.

A person may prove he or she is a citizen by his or her certification under penalty of perjury on the affidavit of registration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2112.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the fact that a person certifies to his or her United States citizenship by signing his or her affidavit of registration shall be deemed evidence of citizenship for voting purposes only.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2114.

The county elections official of any county in this state may receive the affidavit of registration of any elector who resides or claims residence in another county in this state. The affidavit shall be forwarded to the county elections official of the county in which the elector resides. The county elections official of the county in which the elector resides shall use the affidavit of registration received from the other county as his or her permanent record of registration.

Registration by this method shall be effective for all elections occurring 15 or more days after receipt of the affidavit of registration by the county elections official to which the affidavit is mailed or
 delivered by the elector.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 13.   (AB 1020)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Operative September 26, 2016, when the Secretary of State issued the certification prescribed by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

2115.

Whenever a voter, between the time of that person’s last registration and the time for the closing of registration for any given election, has lawfully changed his or her surname, the voter shall reregister under the new or changed name. The voter shall make an additional statement at the time of reregistration, giving the name under which he or she was last registered.

This additional statement shall be given in the prior registration portion of the affidavit of registration before the affidavit is signed, and shall be deemed a part of the affidavit. Upon reregistration, the registration of the voter shall be immediately updated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 14.   (AB 1020)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Operative September 26, 2016, when the Secretary of State issued the certification prescribed by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

2116.

(a) Whenever a voter, between the time of that person’s last voter registration and the time for the closing of registration for any given election, has changed his or her residence address by moving, the voter shall execute a new affidavit of registration or a notice or a letter of the change of address as permitted in Section 2119, in order to be eligible to vote at the next election.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a voter who has changed his or her residence address by moving may vote at the election immediately following the change of residence if he or she is entitled to vote under Section 2035 or 14311.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1123, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2119.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (d) and Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 2170), the county elections official shall accept affidavits of registration at all times except during the 14 days immediately preceding an election, when registration shall cease for that election as to electors residing in the territory within which the election is held.

(b) Transfers of registration for an election may be made from one precinct to another precinct in the same county, from one county to another county, or for a residence address change within the same precinct at any time registration is in progress in the precinct or county to which the elector seeks to transfer. In lieu of executing
 a new affidavit of registration for a change of address, the county elections official shall accept a notice, a letter of the change of address signed by a voter as the voter is registered, or written notice.

The former address shall be maintained with the voter record and the registration of the voter shall be immediately updated.

(c) If the reregistration or transfer is from one county to another county, the county elections official of the county in which the voter was formerly registered shall be notified and the registration of the voter shall be immediately updated.

(d) The county elections official shall accept an affidavit of registration or a notification for the forthcoming election and shall immediately update the address on the
 voter’s affidavit of registration accordingly if the affidavit of registration or notification is executed on or before the 15th day prior to the election and if any of the following apply:

(1) The mailed affidavit of registration or notification is postmarked on or before the 15th day prior to the election and received by mail by the county elections official before the close of the polls on election day.

(2) The affidavit of registration or notification is submitted to the Department of Motor Vehicles or accepted by any other public agency designated as a voter registration agency pursuant to the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.) on or before the 15th day prior to the election.

(3) The
 affidavit of registration or notification is delivered to the county elections official by means other than those described in paragraphs (1) and (2) on or before the 15th day prior to the election.

(4) The affidavit is submitted electronically on the internet website of the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 2196 on or before the 15th day prior to the election.

(e) If the registration, reregistration, or notification is executed during the 14 days before an election or is executed on or before the 15th day prior to the election, but does not meet any of the conditions set forth in subdivision (d), the registration of the voter or the update to the registration of the voter shall be immediately processed, but the voter will not be eligible to vote in that
 election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 109, Sec. 3.   (AB 2582)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2119.5.

(a) From the 14th day immediately preceding an election until the close of polls on election day, in lieu of executing a new affidavit of registration for a change of address within the same county, the county elections official shall accept a written request by a voter that contains all of the following:

(1) The voter’s printed name.

(2) The voter’s former residence address.

(3) The voter’s new residence address.

(4) A certification by the voter of the content of the written request as to
 its truthfulness and correctness, under penalty of perjury.

(5) The voter’s signature and date of execution.

(b) The written request shall be delivered to the county elections official’s office or to any location that offers conditional voter registration and at which a ballot can be issued. Following delivery to such a location, the county elections official shall issue a ballot in accordance with the following:

(1) A nonprovisional ballot shall be issued to the voter if either of the following applies:

(A) The voter appears at the voter’s precinct, the voter’s name is found on the roster, and the voter either has not been issued a vote by mail ballot
 or the conditions set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 3015 are satisfied.

(B) The voter appears at a location that is equipped with an electronic poll book or other means to determine the voter’s precinct, the location can provide the voter with a ballot for the voter’s precinct, the entire county has established connectivity between locations, and the location at which the voter appears verifies that the voter has not cast a ballot at another location for the election and notes in the voter’s record that the voter cast a ballot.

(2) A provisional ballot shall be issued to the voter if either of the following applies:

(A) The voter appears at the voter’s precinct, the voter’s name is found on the roster, the voter has
 been issued a vote by mail ballot, and the conditions set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 3015 are not satisfied.

(B) The voter appears at a location, other than the voter’s precinct, that is equipped with an electronic poll book or other means to determine the voter’s precinct, but the entire county has not established connectivity between locations such that the location is unable to verify that the voter has not cast a ballot at another location for the election.

(c) Upon receipt of a properly executed written request described in subdivision (a), the registration of the voter shall be immediately updated and the written request shall be maintained with the voter’s record.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   (SB 207)   Effective February 13, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2120.

(a) If the county elections official receives a letter from a voter stating that the voter has moved to a new address in another county in the state and the voter provides the new address, the elections official shall immediately update the voter’s registration and the former address shall be maintained with the voter record.

(b) If the county elections official receives a letter from a voter stating that the voter has moved to a new address in another county in the state and the voter does not provide the new address, the elections official shall cancel the old registration for any election occurring at least 15 days after the receipt of the letter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 20.   (AB 1020)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Operative September 26, 2016, when the Secretary of State issued the certification prescribed by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

2121.

No fees may be charged for registration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2122.

The county elections official may cause to be written or printed upon the top margin, or in the body of the affidavit, in addition to any matter provided for in this code, any words necessary or convenient to designate the precinct, district, or political subdivision for which the affidavit is taken, or to indicate any removal or transfer of registration. Any other reasonable memoranda may be added that is necessary or convenient to enable the county elections official to perform his or her duties in assorting or classifying or handling affidavits with correctness and dispatch. However, the memoranda shall not include notations, whether coded or not, that indicate that the registrant has signed a particular initiative, referendum, or recall petition unless the notations are made other than on the body of the affidavit of registration. Any memoranda, notations, devices, computer data, or other means or material employed by the elections official indicating which petition or petitions have been signed by any registrant shall be destroyed as soon as practicable after the certification of the results of the election for which the memoranda, notations, devices, computer data, or other means or material was used, or if no election is held, as soon as practicable after the final certification of the elections official showing the results of the examination of the petition. In no event shall the memoranda, notations, devices, computer data, or other means or material be retained for more than 30 days.

The memoranda, notations, devices, computer data, or other means or material employed by the elections official indicating which petition or petitions have been signed by any registrant shall be available for the use of the elections official and his or her staff only and then only for the purposes for which they were prepared. Except as previously provided, they shall not be made available to any person or entity, public or private, for any purpose whatsoever.

Memoranda added to the body of the affidavit of registration, which are not applicable to the requirements of Section 2150, shall not be deemed a portion of the affidavit.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2123.

In accordance with Section 11 of the initiative act approved by a majority of the voters at the general election held on November 4, 1930, (Statutes of 1931, p. lxxxiii) and entitled “An act to amend Sections 1083a, 1094, 1095a, 1097, 1103, 1105, 1106, 1115, 1120, and to repeal Sections 1228 and 1229 of the Political Code, relating to registration of electors and conduct of elections,” no amendment by the Legislature shall provide for a general biennial or other periodic reregistration of voters.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2124.

The Secretary of State shall, by regulation, adopt uniform standards for proof of residency, which shall apply in all instances where voters and new registrants are required by law to prove residency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 809, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Reimbursable Voter Outreach Costs [2130. - 2131.]

2130.

From moneys appropriated by the Legislature, the Controller shall allocate and disburse to the counties the amounts necessary to reimburse them for net costs incurred by them in complying with the voter registration provisions, including the provisions authorizing voter registration by mail and voter outreach programs, as set forth in Chapter 704 of the Statutes of 1975, as amended. The Secretary of State, in consultation with the Controller, shall develop a formula for the reimbursement of these costs. The Controller shall prescribe the forms for filing claims pursuant to this section. These claims shall be submitted to the Controller by February 15 in the year following the fiscal year in which the costs were incurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 402, Sec. 2.   (AB 2797)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

2131.

The Secretary of State may provide grants to local elections officials, nonprofit corporations, and unincorporated associations for the following purposes:

(a) To conduct voter outreach and voter education programs, in accordance with the requirements of the Help America Vote Act of 2002 (P.L. 107-252), using funds provided to the state by Sections 101 and 251 of that act.

(b) To increase accessibility for eligible voters with disabilities, in accordance with the requirements of the Help America Vote Act of 2002 (P.L. 107-252), using funds provided to the state by Section 261 of that act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 809, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Registration Procedures [2138. - 2143.]

2138.

Individuals and organizations distributing voter registration cards pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2158 and who receive completed voter registration cards from voters shall return the completed cards to the county elections official or shall deposit the cards in the postal service within three days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and state holidays, of receipt from a voter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2138.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, an affiant’s driver’s license number, identification card number, social security number, and signature contained on an affidavit of registration are confidential and shall not be disclosed by an individual or organization that distributes voter registration cards pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2158, or by a person entrusted with an affidavit of registration from an elector pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2158. However, this subdivision shall not be construed to prohibit a person entrusted with an affidavit of registration from an elector pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2158 from returning the affidavit to the individual or organization that distributed the voter registration card pursuant to
 subdivision (b) of Section 2158.

(b) An individual or organization that distributes voter registration cards pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2158, a person entrusted with an affidavit of registration from an elector pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2158, or an individual or organization that assists with the submission of an affidavit of registration electronically on the Internet Web site of the Secretary of State shall comply with both of the following:

(1) Shall not use affidavit of registration information for any personal, private, or commercial purpose, including for any of the following:

(A) The harassment of a voter or voter’s household. 
